Connecticut, session 2026, SB00438.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
1 Section 1. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) (a) As used in this section:
2 (1) "Grocery store" means any store that derives a majority of such
3 store's retail sales from groceries;
4 (2) "Groceries" includes (A) any raw or processed food or beverage
5 intended for human consumption, and (B) when sold by a retailer that
6 also sells food and beverages, (i) prescription and over-the-counter
7 drugs, (ii) personal care and hygiene items, and (iii) household
8 maintenance items. "Groceries" does not include alcoholic beverages
9 and cannabis products;
10 (3) "Manual checkout station" means a checkout station in which
11 there is an employee to provide assistance to customers by scanning and
12 bagging items purchased by customers and taking payment for such
sSB438 / File No. 474 1

sSB438 File No. 474
13 customers' purchases; and
14 (4) "Self-checkout station" means an automated checkout station in
15 which a customer can scan, bag and pay for such customer's items
16 purchased without employee assistance.
17 (b) Any grocery store that offers a self-checkout station shall:
18 (1) Provide not fewer than one manual checkout station for every two
19 self-checkout stations offered at a location; and
20 (2) Have not fewer than one employee for every two self-checkout
21 stations monitoring such stations.
22 (c) No employee assigned to monitor self-checkout stations pursuant
23 to subdivision (2) of subsection (b) of this section shall be assigned any
24 other duties while monitoring such stations.
25 (d) No grocery store shall offer more than eight self-checkout stations
26 at a location at any time.
27 (e) An employee or customer who believes a grocery store has
28 violated the provisions of this section may file a complaint with the
29 Labor Commissioner alleging such violation.
30 (f) Upon receipt of a complaint alleging a violation pursuant to
31 subsection (e) of this section, the commissioner shall promptly
32 investigate such alleged violation. If the commissioner finds evidence of
33 such a violation, the commissioner shall immediately notify the grocery
34 store of such evidence and allegations.
35 (g) If, after thirty days of receiving a notice of a violation of this
36 section pursuant to subsection (f) of this section, the grocery store fails
37 to take corrective action, such grocery store may be liable to the Labor
38 Department for a civil penalty equal to a full day of wages, based on the
39 highest wage paid to a retail clerk at such grocery store, for each day in
40 which the violation continues.
41 (h) The commissioner may adopt regulations, in accordance with the
sSB438 / File No. 474 2

sSB438 File No. 474
42 provisions of chapter 54 of the general statutes, to implement the
43 provisions of this section.
44 (i) No grocery store shall discharge, or in any manner discriminate or
45 retaliate against, any employee or customer who in good faith makes a
46 complaint pursuant to subsection (e) of this section. An employee or
47 customer who believes a grocery store violated the provisions of this
48 subsection may bring a civil action in the Superior Court to recover
49 damages and such injunctive relief as the court deems appropriate.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 New section
Statement of Legislative Commissioners:
In Subsec. (f), "alleged" was deleted for accuracy.
LAB Joint Favorable Subst. -LCO
sSB438 / File No. 474 3

sSB438 File No. 474
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact:
Agency Affected Fund-Effect FY 27 $ FY 28 $
Labor Dept. GF - Potential See Below See Below
Revenue Gain
Note: GF=General Fund
Municipal Impact: None
Explanation
The bill establishes requirements for grocery store self-checkout
stations and allows employees or customers to file complaints1
regarding violations with the Department of Labor (DOL). This results
in a potential revenue gain for the DOL to the extent that grocery stores
fail to take corrective actions upon found violations and therefore
subject to civil penalties2.
The bill also prohibits retaliation against employees or customers that
file complaints to the DOL and allows aggravated parties to bring civil
action in Superior Court. This does not result in a fiscal impact to the
Judicial Department. The court system disposes of over 250,000 cases
annually and the number of cases is not anticipated to be great enough
to need additional resources.
The Out Years
The annualized ongoing fiscal impact identified above would
1 It is expected the agency can accommodate any potential workload increases within
available resources.
2 The penalty is equal to a full day of wages, based on the highest wage paid to a retail
clerk at such grocery store, for each day the violation continues.
sSB438 / File No. 474 4

sSB438 File No. 474
continue into the future subject to the occurrence of violations and the
collection of associated penalties.
sSB438 / File No. 474 5

sSB438 File No. 474
OLR Bill Analysis
sSB 438
AN ACT REGULATING SELF-CHECKOUT STATIONS IN GROCERY
STORES.